Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.07
Business, defined.

Business means any activity engaged in by any person or caused to be engaged in by him or her with the object of gain, benefit, or advantage, either direct or indirect.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 77-2702.04;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 11.